Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB672.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.210 is amended to read as follows:
From the time of the submission of the budget recommendation of each branch of
government to the General Assembly until the enactment of all branch budget bills,
representatives of each branch of government shall be at the disposal of the General
Assembly and its appropriations committees and shall devote as much of their time as
may be required to the work of those committees, under the direction of their respective
chairmen. The Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Transportation Cabinet, and the
Office of State Budget Director shall provide such additional assistance to each branch of
government as may be required.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/4/2026 11:24 AM Jacketed